Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.135

Sexual harassment in the workplace.

Agencies as defined in RCW 41.06.020, except for institutions of higher education, shall:

(1) Update or develop and disseminate among all agency employees and contractors a policy that:

(a) Defines and prohibits sexual harassment in the workplace;

(b) Includes procedures that describe how the agency will address concerns of employees who are affected by sexual harassment in the workplace;

(c) Identifies appropriate sanctions and disciplinary actions; and

(d) Complies with guidelines adopted by the director of personnel under RCW 41.06.395;

(2) Respond promptly and effectively to sexual harassment concerns;

(3) Conduct training and education for all employees in order to prevent and eliminate sexual harassment in the organization;

(4) Inform employees of their right to file a complaint with the Washington state human rights commission under chapter 49.60 RCW, or with the federal equal employment opportunity commission under Title VII of the civil rights act of 1964; and

(5) Report to the department of enterprise services on compliance with this section.

The cost of the training programs shall be borne by state agencies within existing resources.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 450; 2007 c 76 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.